lexc/noun/enhuoajaje.lexc
!!!enhuoa.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Noun[gcat]

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem 
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc[lfea] +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter
      
§uue§ §UUE§ §OEOE§ §AE§ §OEOE2§
§UUE1§ §oooe§ §AAA§ §oeoe§ §AA§ §oeoez§ §AE1§  §b§ §h§ §k§ §n§ §r§ §t§ §JJ§ §JPJ§
§VV§   §ooez13§ §EOA2§ §OEOE11§ §oeoez12§ §oeoez11§
      
LEXICON Root
Noun ;

!define Cons [b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z];
!define Vowel [a | á | e | é | i | í | o | ó | u | ú | ü | ű | ö | ő];
!define Root [ [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3}] | [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3} Cons^{1,4} Vowel^{0,3} ]* ] ;

! szavak:
! agykárosodott
! aszálykárosult
! borjúbecsinált
! csirkebecsinált
! degenerált
! gát
! halláskárosult
! hasznosult
! hold
! jogosult
! jégkárosult
! látáskárosult
! polgárosult
! tűzkárosult
! állandósult
! árvízkárosult
! 
LEXICON Noun
ablakhold AddNoun;
agykárosodott AddNoun;
alvógát AddNoun;
anyaműhold AddNoun;
aranyfélhold AddNoun;
aranyhold AddNoun;
aszálykárosult AddNoun;
ballonhold AddNoun;
bekötőgát AddNoun;
betongát AddNoun;
bolygóhold AddNoun;
bombakárosult AddNoun;
borjúbecsinált AddNoun;
bukógát AddNoun;
bádoggát AddNoun;
bányahold AddNoun;
bíborhold AddNoun;
börtönhold AddNoun;
csarnokvízgát AddNoun;
cseppkőgát AddNoun;
csibebecsinált AddNoun;
csirkebecsinált AddNoun;
csordítógát AddNoun;
célműhold AddNoun;
cölöpgát AddNoun;
degenerált AddNoun;
duzzasztógát AddNoun;
dzsungelhold AddNoun;
elemikárosult AddNoun;
erődgát AddNoun;
ezüstfélhold AddNoun;
ezüsthold AddNoun;
fagát AddNoun;
farkashold AddNoun;
fedezőgát AddNoun;
felderítőhold AddNoun;
fenékgát AddNoun;
fogyóhold AddNoun;
folyógát AddNoun;
félhold AddNoun;
fémgát AddNoun;
fényképezőműhold AddNoun;
földgát AddNoun;
füstgát AddNoun;
főgát AddNoun;
gammaműhold AddNoun;
gumigát AddNoun;
gát AddNoun;
hadikárosult AddNoun;
halastógát AddNoun;
halláskárosult AddNoun;
hanggát AddNoun;
harmóniagát AddNoun;
harántgát AddNoun;
hasznosult AddNoun;
hold AddNoun;
homokdombgát AddNoun;
homokgát AddNoun;
hullámgát AddNoun;
háttérműhold AddNoun;
hírhold AddNoun;
hódgát AddNoun;
hógát AddNoun;
hőgát AddNoun;
igényjogosult AddNoun;
ikerhold AddNoun;
illetményjogosult AddNoun;
jelzálogjogosult AddNoun;
jogosult AddNoun;
jászolgát AddNoun;
jéggát AddNoun;
jégkárosult AddNoun;
kalcitgát AddNoun;
kalózhold AddNoun;
keresztgát AddNoun;
kiflihold AddNoun;
kikötőgát AddNoun;
kisbolygóhold AddNoun;
kishold AddNoun;
kutatóhold AddNoun;
kutatóműhold AddNoun;
kémműhold AddNoun;
kísérőhold AddNoun;
körgát AddNoun;
körömhold AddNoun;
közgát AddNoun;
közvetítőhold AddNoun;
kőgát AddNoun;
látáskárosult AddNoun;
léggát AddNoun;
léggömbgát AddNoun;
léggömbhold AddNoun;
lézerhold AddNoun;
lézerműhold AddNoun;
malomgát AddNoun;
megfigyelőműhold AddNoun;
mellékhold AddNoun;
mentőhold AddNoun;
minihold AddNoun;
miniműhold AddNoun;
morénagát AddNoun;
mozgógát AddNoun;
mészkőgát AddNoun;
műgát AddNoun;
műhold AddNoun;
nagyhold AddNoun;
negyedhold AddNoun;
nyugdíjjogosult AddNoun;
nyúlgát AddNoun;
oldalgát AddNoun;
ostromgát AddNoun;
osztógát AddNoun;
papirosgát AddNoun;
papírhold AddNoun;
partgát AddNoun;
polgárosult AddNoun;
porcelánhold AddNoun;
potenciálgát AddNoun;
pásztorhold AddNoun;
radarműhold AddNoun;
rekeszgát AddNoun;
rizsgát AddNoun;
részjogosult AddNoun;
révgát AddNoun;
rézhold AddNoun;
rönkgát AddNoun;
röntgenhold AddNoun;
röntgenműhold AddNoun;
rőzsegát AddNoun;
sarlóhold AddNoun;
szikragát AddNoun;
szinkronműhold AddNoun;
szirtgát AddNoun;
szivárgógát AddNoun;
szolgagát AddNoun;
szorítógát AddNoun;
szántóhold AddNoun;
szárnygát AddNoun;
szükséggát AddNoun;
szűrőgát AddNoun;
sólyomhold AddNoun;
sövénygát AddNoun;
tanulógát AddNoun;
tartalékhold AddNoun;
tartalékműhold AddNoun;
tejnugát AddNoun;
telehold AddNoun;
telihold AddNoun;
teliholdhold AddNoun;
terelőgát AddNoun;
terelőhold AddNoun;
teszthold AddNoun;
textilhold AddNoun;
torokgát AddNoun;
tuskógát AddNoun;
téglahold AddNoun;
töltésgát AddNoun;
törmelékgát AddNoun;
törmelékhold AddNoun;
tükörműhold AddNoun;
tűzgát AddNoun;
tűzkárosult AddNoun;
ugrógát AddNoun;
vasfélhold AddNoun;
vikinghold AddNoun;
virághold AddNoun;
választójogosult AddNoun;
vándorhold AddNoun;
védőgát AddNoun;
végmorénagát AddNoun;
vízduzzasztógát AddNoun;
vízgát AddNoun;
vízkárosult AddNoun;
völgygát AddNoun;
völgyzárógát AddNoun;
zsilipgát AddNoun;
zárógát AddNoun;
zúgógát AddNoun;
állandósult AddNoun;
árnyékhold AddNoun;
árvízgát AddNoun;
árvízkárosult AddNoun;
átjárógát AddNoun;
élőgát AddNoun;
öntözőgát AddNoun;
övgát AddNoun;
újhold AddNoun;
úszógát AddNoun;
űrhold AddNoun;



LEXICON AddNoun
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Poss
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez13§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA2§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor              #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE11§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE11§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§JJ§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, önk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE11§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§JJ§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPJ§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPJ§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPJ§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPJ§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPJ§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPJ§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON Plur
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Gen;
                            Gen;
       
LEXICON Fam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen;

LEXICON Gen
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;
 
LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez12§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§     #;  ! val, vel
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l     #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor
